District of Columbia statutes.
3-1208.64

Certification of veterinary euthanasia technicians; restrictions.

(a)

No person may euthanize an animal without first obtaining certification by the Board of Veterinary Medicine as a veterinary euthanasia technician.

(b)

A person certified as a veterinary euthanasia technician shall not provide veterinary euthanasia services except while under the general supervision of a veterinarian licensed in the District.

(c)

A certified veterinary euthanasia technician shall only provide services related to the humane euthanasia of an animal as prescribed by the Mayor through rulemaking.

(d)

A person certified as a veterinary euthanasia technician shall not receive compensation for performing veterinary euthanasia technician services, except that a certified veterinary euthanasia technician may receive a salary or other compensation paid by an employing veterinarian, veterinary facility, humane society, animal shelter, animal control facility, or wildlife rehabilitation facility.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 864
as added Mar. 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 102(q), 61 DCR 1184
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-96 added this section.